Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2104.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6000XS (2) 91 sb/js S.F. 2104 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 455B.280 Large water use facilities 1 ââ reporting requirements. 2 1. For purposes of this section: 3 a. âCryptocurrencyâ means any electronic token that 4 represents or evidences economic value or economic, 5 proprietary, or access rights, may be used as payment in 6 specified markets, and is digitally recorded on a distributed 7 ledger. 8 b. âCryptocurrency miningâ means the process by which 9 a computer, also known as a node or mining rig, validates 10 blockchain transactions for a specific cryptocurrency and, in 11 turn, receives a mining reward for its computational effort. 12 c. âLarge water use facilityâ means a facility that uses or 13 is able to use twenty-five thousand gallons or more per day and 14 is primarily engaged in the business of one of the following: 15 (1) Providing a service as described under code number 16 518210 of the North American industry classification system. 17 (2) Ethyl alcohol manufacturing as described under code 18 number 325193 of the North American industry classification 19 system. 20 (3) Cryptocurrency mining. 21 2. On or before March 31 of each year, each large water use 22 facility shall submit a report to the department that includes 23 detailed information on the facilityâs water use from the 24 previous year. 25